Illinois, session 104th, HB5706.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The sum of $5,000,000, or so much thereof as may 5be necessary, is appropriated from the Capital Projects Fund 6to the Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity for a 7grant to the DuPage Children's Museum for costs associated 8with operational expenses of the museum. 9    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 102026.